Armenian/Dictionaries/martakert_hyspell/martakert_hyspell.aff
FLAG long
#nel qel
SFX	VD	Y	165
SFX	VD	նել	ա/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ավ/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ա/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ավ/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	չել	ածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	ել	ող/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	ել	ողներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվող/CHABGEINLODEPP .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցվողներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ցվող/CHABGEINLODEPP .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցվողներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ցված/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	չել	ցվածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցված/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ել .	
SFX	VD	չել	ել .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրել .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցրել .
SFX	VD	նել	իր .	
SFX	VD	չել	իր .
SFX	VD	նել	եք .	
SFX	VD	չել	եք .
SFX	VD	ել	վել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	ել	վեմ/CH	.
SFX	VD	ել	վես/CH	.
SFX	VD	ել	վի/CH	.
SFX	VD	ել	վենք/CH	.
SFX	VD	ել	վեք/CH	.
SFX	VD	ել	վեն/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	նել	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցվիր .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեցեք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրու .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցեք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեմ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնես/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնենք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեն/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցներ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեին/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեց/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցին/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրին/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվելիս	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվում	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնում	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեր .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեմ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվես/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվենք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվէք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեն/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեին/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեց/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեցինք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեցիք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցվեցին/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	չել	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցվիր .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեցեք .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեք .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրու .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցեք .
SFX	VD	չել	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեմ/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնես/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնենք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեն/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցներ/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեին/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեց/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցին/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրին/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվելիս	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվում	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնում	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեր .
SFX	VD	չել	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեմ/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվես/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվենք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեն/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեինք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեիք/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեին/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեց/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեցինք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեցիք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցվեցին/CH .

#tsnel վերցնել
SFX	VE	Y	55
SFX	VE	նել	րի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րեց/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րինք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րիք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րին/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րեցի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րեցինք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րեցիք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րեցին/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	վել/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեմ/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վես/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վենք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեն/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վել/CHINLODE	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեինք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեիք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեին/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեինք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեիք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեին/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեցի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեց/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեցինք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեցիք/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեցին/CH	.
SFX	VE	ել	ող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	ել	ողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	րած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	րածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	վող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	վողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	ված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	վածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VE	նել	րել .
SFX	VE	նել	րու .	
SFX	VE	ել	իր .	
SFX	VE	նել	րեք .	
SFX	VE	նել	վիր .	
SFX	VE	նել	վեցեք .
SFX	VE	նել	վելիս	.
SFX	VE	նել	վում	.
SFX	VE	նել	վեր .
SFX	VE	0	ով .

#irregular
SFX	VI	Y	33
SFX	VI	0	ի	.
SFX	VI	0	իր	.
SFX	VI	0	ինք	.
SFX	VI	0	իք	.
SFX	VI	0	ին	.
SFX	VI	մ	ս	.
SFX	VI	մ	նք	.
SFX	VI	մ	ք	.
SFX	VI	մ	ն	.
SFX	VI	մ	ի	.
SFX	VI	մ	իր	.
SFX	VI	մ	ր	.
SFX	VI	մ	ինք	.
SFX	VI	մ	իք	.
SFX	VI	մ	ին	.
SFX	VI	ել	ա	.
SFX	VI	ել	ար	.
SFX	VI	ել	ավ	.
SFX	VI	ել	անք	.
SFX	VI	ել	աք	.
SFX	VI	ել	ն	.
SFX	VI	ել	ած	.
SFX	VI	ալ	վի	.
SFX	VI	ալ	վիր	.
SFX	VI	ալ	վինք	.
SFX	VI	ալ	վիք	.
SFX	VI	ալ	վին	.
SFX	VI	ռնալ	րձա	.
SFX	VI	ռնալ	րձար	.
SFX	VI	ռնալ	րձավ	.
SFX	VI	ռնալ	րձանք	.
SFX	VI	ռնալ	րձաք	.
SFX	VI	ռնալ	րձան	.
